ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.aff
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAMISTELTKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAMISTENA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAMISTENAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAMISTENI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAMISTENIGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAMISTES
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAMISTESKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAMISTESSE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAMISTESSEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAMISTEST
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAMISTESTKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAMISTETA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAMISTETAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAMISTKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAN
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GANGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAS
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GASID
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GASIDKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GASIME
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GASIMEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GASIN
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GASINGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GASITE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GASITEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GASKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GATE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GATEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAV
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAD
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVADKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAGA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAGAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAID
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAIDKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAIGA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAIGAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAIKS
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAIKSKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAIL
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAILE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAILEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAILGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAILT
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAILTKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAINA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAINAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAINI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAINIGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAIS
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAISKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAISSE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAISSEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAIST
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAISTKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAITA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAITAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAKS
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAKSKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAL
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVALE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVALEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVALGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVALT
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVALTKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVANA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVANAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVANI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVANIGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAS
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVASKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVASSE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVASSEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAST
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVASTKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVAT
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATEGA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATEGAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATEKS
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATEKSKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATEL
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATELE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATELEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATELGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATELT
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATELTKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATENA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATENAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATENI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATENIGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATES
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATESKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATESSE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATESSEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATEST
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATESTKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATETA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATETAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVATKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUS
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSED
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEDKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEGA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEGAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEID
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEIDKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEIGA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEIGAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEIKS
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEIKSKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEIL
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEILE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEILEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEILGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEILT
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEILTKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEINA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEINAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEINI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEINIGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEIS
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEISKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEISSE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEISSEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEIST
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEISTKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEITA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEITAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEKS
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEKSKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEL
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSELE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSELEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSELGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSELT
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSELTKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSENA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSENAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSENI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSENIGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSES
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSESKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSESSE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSESSEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSEST
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSESTKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSETA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSETAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSIGA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSIGAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSIGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSIKS
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSIKSKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSIL
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSILE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSILEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSILGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSILT
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSILTKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSINA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSINAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSINI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSINIGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSIS
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSISKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSISSE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSISSEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSIST
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSISTKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSITA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSITAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSSE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSSEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUST
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTEGA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTEGAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTEKS
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTEKSKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTEL
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTELE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTELEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTELGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTELT
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTELTKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTENA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTENAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTENI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTENIGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTES
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTESKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTESSE
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTESSEGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTEST
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTESTKI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTETA
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTETAGI
	[LR] J A N U D	>	-JANUD,GAVUSTKI

# rule/flag 13841 (affects 72744 words, has 25 subrules):
flag y:
	D A	>	-A,ETA
	D A	>	-A,ETAGI
	D A	>	-A,ETAGU
	D A	>	-A,ETAGUGI
	D A	>	-A,ETAKS
	D A	>	-A,ETAKSE
	D A	>	-A,ETAKSEGI
	D A	>	-A,ETAKSKI
	D A	>	-A,ETAMA
	D A	>	-A,ETAMAGI
	D A	>	-A,ETAV
	D A	>	-A,ETAVGI
	D A	>	-A,ETAVUS
	D A	>	-A,ETAVUSKI
	D A	>	-A,ETAVUSSE
	D A	>	-A,ETAVUSSEGI
	D A	>	-A,ETAVUST
	D A	>	-A,ETAVUSTKI
	D A	>	-A,ETI
	D A	>	-A,ETIGI
	G A	>	-A,I
	U D	>	-D,KSIDKI
	U D	>	-D,KSIMEGI
	U D	>	-D,KSINGI
	U D	>	-D,KSITEGI
