ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.dict
adekvaatsustega/almny
agitatsioonilisusega/abehklmny
ainestega/almny
akumulatiivsustega/almny
alkaloidsusiga/ajly
amfiboolsusiga/ajly
andelisusega/abehklmny
antiseptikumiga/acefijkly
aproksimatiivsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
armastavusiga/ajly
asaga/abcfiky
astrikkudega/almny
augustiga/abcehijlmoy
avitaminoosiga/acefijkly
batõrrega/almny
bituumeniga/abcehijlmoy
brokaadiga/aceijly
deemoniga/abcehijlmoy
departemangega/almny
didaktilisusiga/ajly
diskussioonilisiga/ajlny
drakoonilisustega/almny
edestanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
einestusiga/ajly
eksportinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
elemendilisustega/almny
endokardiidiga/aceijly
epistolaarsusiga/ajly
esiteluga/acdeghimy
eukalüptiga/acefijkly
farsitamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
filoloogilisusiga/ajly
formaatinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
funktsionalistlikuga/acdegjlmy
geeniusiga/ajly
gonorroilisusiga/ajly
haagitavusiga/ajly
hajutustega/almny
hangeldusega/abhilmny
harulisega/abdhjlmny
heitlusega/abehiklmny
helmintoosega/almny
hiinalikega/ajlmny
histoloogega/almny
hoonestusega/abhilmny
hullutustega/almny
hämarikega/almny
hõimulisusega/abehklmny
hühinaga/abcdefgikmnoy
ideaaliga/acefijkly
iileusiga/ajly
imendustega/almny
induktsioonilistega/almny
inspektrissiga/acefijkly
invasioonilisega/abdhjlmny
istutustega/almny
jambilistega/almny
joomelistega/almny
jumalannaga/abcdfghiky
jädemelistega/almny
jätislikkudega/almny
jõustikkudega/almny
kabalistikaga/abcdefgikmnoy
kaheldavusega/abehklmny
kakasega/abdehjklmnoy
kallimusega/abehklmny
kangelaslikega/ajlmny
karaadisusega/abehklmny
karmiiniga/acefijkly
kastoriga/abcehijlmoy
kattelisega/abdhjlmny
keedusega/abehiklmny
kehtivaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
kergekesusega/abehklmny
kidajusega/abehklmny
kiimlevustega/almny
kilkamisega/abhlmny
kipakusega/abehklmny
kiskuvaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
klapsatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kloğitavusega/abehklmny
koetuga/abcdefgijklmnoy
kohtunikuga/acdegimy
kollakustega/almny
komfortsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
komödiantidega/almny
konsistooriumega/almny
konverditavusiga/ajly
koorjusega/abehklmny
korilasiga/ajly
kosjaga/abcfhiky
kraksatusiga/ajly
kriminaalsustega/almny
krutsifiksiga/acefijkly
kuivatustega/almny
kultuurlasiga/ajly
kurbustega/almny
kuudaga/abcefikny
kvardiga/aceijly
käntsatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
käsnasusiga/ajly
kõhtsustega/almny
kõntsasusiga/ajly
kõõksatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
külgsustega/almny
küüdulistega/almny
lademikkudega/almny
lahustuvusega/abehklmny
laksutustega/almny
laptuuga/acdeghimy
lausaldasusiga/ajly
lehekustega/almny
lembesiga/ajlny
levinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
liibüalasiga/ajly
likvideerunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lirumustega/almny
loidetavusega/abehklmny
lotakusiga/ajly
läilakusiga/ajly
lõpetatusiga/ajly
maalisega/abdehjklmnoy
malevaga/abcdefgikmnoy
matriarhaalsusiga/ajly
mesoniga/abcehijlmoy
mitmendustega/almny
muhkudega/almny
muulega/almny
mõistetamatuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
müsetiga/aceijly
natsionaalsusega/abehklmny
nilvasusega/abehklmny
noviitsega/almny
nälpavustega/almny
nöögiga/aceijly
olemuslikuga/acdegjlmy
orkestraalsusiga/ajly
pahnanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pandavaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
parukaga/abcdefgikmnoy
peidetavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
pigitunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
piltidega/almny
plartsatustega/almny
polügooniga/acefijkly
prahtidega/almny
pronksjustega/almny
puhitavusega/abehklmny
pusanud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
põgenikega/almny
pööretega/almny
rahkadega/almny
ratsutiga/abcehijlmoy
relsiga/aceijly
rihvliga/abcehijlmoy
rohkendusiga/ajly
rupsiga/acefijkly
rõskusega/abehiklmny
saavusiga/ajly
samovarega/almny
seersantidega/almny
sentaavoga/aily
siirdunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sitkendanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sombitavusega/abehklmny
spasmiga/acefijkly
streptotsiidega/almny
summutusiga/ajly
sämpjusega/abehklmny
sõõrutusiga/ajly
süsteemituga/abcdefgjklmnoy
taimlaga/abcdefgikmnoy
tarbimusiga/ajly
tehtavustega/almny
territoriaalsusiga/ajly
tipulisusega/abehklmny
tootlusega/abehiklmny
treivustega/almny
tsirkumfleksega/almny
tunavusega/abdhjlmny
tähendusega/abhilmny
tõmmatavaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
tülitsusiga/ajly
ulmekaga/abcdefgikmnoy
vaaraoga/aily
vakaga/abcfiky
varalisustega/almny
veetlematuga/abcdefgkmoy
vihisenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
viljelusiga/ajly
vivipaariga/acefijkly
vähilisega/abhilmny
võbinaga/abcdefgikmnoy
võtlikkudega/almny
ğarmantsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
õppidega/almny
ürikulisiga/ajlny
